Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 1. State Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan.
§ 25-15-15.
Payment of premiums; active full-time employees assessed portion of active employee premium under certain circumstances; purchase of additional coverage; late charges and interest penalties; State Employees Insurance Fund; Insurance Reserve Fund [Repealed effective July 1, 2022].

The board is authorized to determine the manner in which premiums and contributions by the state agencies, local school districts, colleges, universities, community/junior colleges and public libraries shall be collected to provide the self-insured health insurance program for employees as provided under this article. The state shall provide fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the above life insurance plan for all active full-time employees. The state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the health insurance plan for active full-time employees initially employed before January 1, 2006, except as otherwise provided in this section. For active full-time employees initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of a basic level of health insurance, except as otherwise provided in this section, and the employees may pay additional amounts to purchase additional benefits or levels of coverage offered under the plan. The board, if determined to be necessary, may assess active full-time employees a portion of the active employee premium in an amount not to exceed Twenty Dollars ($20.00) per month, notwithstanding any language in this section to the contrary. All active full-time employees shall be given the opportunity to purchase coverage for their eligible dependents with the premiums for such dependent coverage, as well as the employee’s fifty percent (50%) share for his life insurance coverage, to be deductible from the employee’s salary by the agency, department or institution head, which deductions, together with the fifty percent (50%) share of such life insurance premiums of such employing agency, department or institution head from funds appropriated to or authorized to be expended by the employing agency, department or institution head, shall be deposited directly into a depository bank or special fund in the State Treasury, as determined by the board. These funds and interest earned on these funds may be used for the disbursement of claims and shall be exempt from the appropriation process.

The state shall provide annually, by line item in the Mississippi Library Commission appropriation bill, such funds to pay one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of health insurance under the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, for full-time library staff members in each public library in Mississippi initially employed before January 1, 2006. For full-time library staff members initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of a basic level of health insurance under the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, and the employees may pay additional amounts to purchase additional benefits or levels of coverage offered under the plan. The commission shall allot to each public library a sufficient amount of those funds appropriated to pay the costs of insurance for eligible employees. Any funds so appropriated by line item which are not expended during the fiscal year for which such funds were appropriated shall be carried forward for the same purposes during the next succeeding fiscal year. If any premiums for the health insurance and/or late charges and interest penalties are not paid by a public library in a timely manner, as defined by the board, the Mississippi Library Commission, upon notice by the board, shall immediately withhold all subsequent disbursements of funds to that public library.

The state shall annually provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the health insurance plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, for public school district employees who work no less than twenty (20) hours during each week and regular nonstudent school bus drivers, if such employees and school bus drivers were initially employed before January 1, 2006. For such employees and school bus drivers initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of a basic level of health insurance under the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, and the employees may pay additional amounts to purchase additional benefits or levels of coverage offered under the plan. Where federal funding is allowable to defray, in full or in part, the cost of participation in the program by district employees who work no less than twenty (20) hours during the week and regular nonstudent bus drivers, whose salaries are paid, in full or in part, by federal funds, the allowance under this section shall be reduced to the extent of such federal funding. Where the use of federal funds is allowable but not available, it is the intent of the Legislature that school districts contribute the cost of participation for such employees from local funds, except that parent fees for child nutrition programs shall not be increased to cover such cost.

The state shall provide annually, by line item in the community/junior college appropriation bill, such funds to pay one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the health insurance plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, for community/junior college district employees initially employed before January 1, 2006, who work no less than twenty (20) hours during each week. For such employees initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the state shall provide one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of a basic level of health insurance under the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan, or any lesser percentage of the cost that is not assessed to the employees by the board, and the employees may pay additional amounts to purchase additional benefits or levels of coverage offered under the plan.

When the use of federal funding is allowable to defray, in full or in part, the cost of participation in the insurance plan by community/junior college district employees who work no less than twenty (20) hours during each week, whose salaries are paid, in full or in part, by federal funds, the allowance under this section shall be reduced to the extent of the federal funding. Where the use of federal funds is allowable but not available, it is the intent of the Legislature that community/junior college districts contribute the cost of participation for such employees from local funds.

Any community/junior college district may contribute to the cost of coverage for any district employee from local community/junior college district funds, and any public school district may contribute to the cost of coverage for any district employee from nonminimum program funds. Any part of the cost of such coverage for participating employees of public school districts and public community/junior college districts that is not paid by the state shall be paid by the participating employees, which shall be deducted from the salaries of the employees in a manner determined by the board.

Any funds appropriated for the cost of insurance by line item in the community/junior colleges appropriation bill which are not expended during the fiscal year for which such funds were appropriated shall be carried forward for the same purposes during the next succeeding fiscal year.

The board may establish and enforce late charges and interest penalties or other penalties for the purpose of requiring the prompt payment of all premiums for life and health insurance permitted under this chapter. All funds in excess of the amount needed for disbursement of claims shall be deposited in a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the State and School Employees Insurance Fund. The State Treasurer shall invest all funds in the State and School Employees Insurance Fund and all interest earned shall be credited to the State and School Employees Insurance Fund. Such funds shall be placed with one or more depositories of the state and invested on the first day such funds are available for investment in certificates of deposit, repurchase agreements or in United States Treasury bills or as otherwise authorized by law for the investment of Public Employees’ Retirement System funds, as long as such investment is made from competitive offering and at the highest and best market rate obtainable consistent with any available investment alternatives; however, such investments shall not be made in shares of stock, common or preferred, or in any other investments which would mature more than one (1) year from the date of investment. The board shall have the authority to draw from this fund periodically such funds as are necessary to operate the self-insurance plan or to pay to the insurance carrier the cost of operation of this plan, it being the purpose to limit the amount of participation by the state to fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the life insurance program and not to limit the contracting for additional benefits where the cost will be paid in full by the employee. The state shall not share in the cost of coverage for retired employees.

The board shall also provide for the creation of an Insurance Reserve Fund and funds therein shall be invested by the State Treasurer with all interest earned credited to the State and School Employees Insurance Fund.

Any retired employee electing to purchase retired life and health insurance will have the full cost of such insurance deducted monthly from his State of Mississippi retirement plan check or direct billed for the cost of the premium if the retirement check is insufficient to pay for the premium. If the board determines actuarially that the premium paid by the participating retirees adversely affects the overall cost of the plan to the state, then the board may impose a premium surcharge, not to exceed fifteen percent (15%), upon such participating retired employees who are under the age for Medicare eligibility and who were initially employed before January 1, 2006. For participating retired employees who are under the age for Medicare eligibility and who were initially employed on or after January 1, 2006, the board may impose a premium surcharge in an amount the board determines actuarially to cover the full cost of insurance.

The board may not impose a premium surcharge or any other premium differential upon any class of participant of the plan based on the use or nonuse of tobacco-related products.

This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2022.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5834-138; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 8; Laws, 1972, ch. 537, § 5; Laws, 1977, ch. 494, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 437; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 148; Laws, 1986, ch. 452; Laws, 1991, ch. 506 § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 533, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 615, § 7; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 7; Laws, 2002, ch. 636, § 8; Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 106, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 25-15-16.
Public school districts may use local funds to pay full cost of health insurance premiums for certain school bus drivers.

The public school districts of the state, in their discretion, may pay with local funds one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of the health insurance premiums of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan for all retired members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System who are employed as school bus drivers by the school districts. No state funds shall be used for payment of the health insurance premiums under the authority of this section. If a school district chooses to pay the health insurance premiums for school bus drivers under the authority of this section, the district shall be authorized to pay any amount that is one hundred percent (100%) or less of the cost of the health insurance premiums for the school bus drivers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 523, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 25-15-17.
Payment of benefits.

Any benefits payable under the plan may be made either directly to the attending physicians, hospitals, medical groups, or others furnishing the services upon which a claim is based, or to the covered employee, upon presentation of valid bills for such services, subject to subsection (3) of this section and such provisions to facilitate payment as may be made by the board. All benefits payable under this plan shall be payable directly to the covered employee unless such covered employee shall make a valid assignment in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

The plan may not, by its terms, limit or restrict the covered employee’s ability to assign the covered employee’s benefits under the policy to a licensed health care provider that provides health care services to the covered employee. Any such plan provision in violation of this subsection shall be invalid.

If the covered employee provides the board with written direction that all or a portion of any indemnities or benefits provided by the plan be paid to a licensed health care provider rendering hospital, nursing, medical or surgical services, then the plan shall pay directly the licensed health care provider rendering such services. That payment shall be considered payment in full to the provider, who may not bill or collect from the covered employee any amount above that payment, other than the deductible, coinsurance, copayment or other charges for equipment or services requested by the covered employee that are noncovered benefits after the signing of an explanatory document about the noncovered benefit by the covered employee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5834-139; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 149; Laws, 2014, ch. 341, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 25-15-19.
Notification of commencement of payroll deductions.

On or before July 1, 1972, the board shall notify all department, agency and institution heads that the employee deductions shall commence on said date.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5834-140; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 10; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 150, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 25-15-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 568, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

[Codes, 1942, § 5834-141; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 13; 1972, ch. 537, § 6; 1977, ch. 494, § 3; 1984, ch. 488, § 151, eff from and after July 1, 1984.]

§ 25-15-23.
Withdrawals from State Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan prohibited.

No agency, board, school district, community/junior college, public library, university, institution or authority of the state shall withdraw, or authorize any agency or institution under its management and control to withdraw, from the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan established under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 568 § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 25-15-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms, effective July 1, 2012.

§25-15-25. [Laws, 2009, ch. 434, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.]